Massachusetts, session 194th, H2703.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 118 of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, “postpartum recovery” shall mean the time period that
occurs immediately following childbirth up to a minimum of 6 weeks, or longer as determined
by a physician.
SECTION 2. Said section 118 of chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out the words “post-delivery recuperation” in lines 45 and 62, in each instance, and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- “postpartum recovery”.
of 3

SECTION 3. Said section 118 of chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by inserting, in line 46, after the word “physician” the following words:- “or emergency medical
personnel”.
SECTION 4. Said section 118 of chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by inserting, in line 72, after the word “inmate” the following words:- “under any circumstances
or in any setting”
SECTION 5. Said section 118 of chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by inserting, in line 78, after the word “superintendent” the following words:- “of a state
correctional facility or administrator of a county facility.”
SECTION 6. Said section 118 of chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by adding the following 3 paragraphs:-
The commissioner of correction and administrator of each county correctional facility
shall require annual training of staff members who transport or supervise female prisoners as to
the provisions of this section.
Any time restraints are used on a pregnant or postpartum inmate, the superintendent of a
state correctional facility or administrator of a county correctional facility shall submit a report
within 48 hours to the secretary of public safety and security, which shall include the date, time,
duration, location and the rationale for the use of restraints, provided, however, that such reports
shall not contain individually identifying information.
The secretary of public safety shall submit to the legislature a public report detailing
compliance with this section, including all incidents involving use of restraints which shall be
of 3

filed no later than July 1 of each year with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives,
the chairs of the joint committee on public safety and homeland security and the chairs of the
joint committee on the judiciary.
of 3